New Jersey, session 222, A3300.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a. As used in P.L.    , c.     (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill): Nonprofit organization means an organization that qualifies as a tax exempt organization under paragraph (3) of subsection (c) of section 501 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, 26 U.S.C. 501(c)(3) or that is organized as a corporation under the New Jersey Nonprofit Corporation Act, N.J.S.15A:1-1 et seq. Public utility shall have the same meaning as provided in R.S.48:2-13. b.    Notwithstanding any law, rule, regulation, or order to the contrary, a public utility shall charge a nonprofit organization a residential rate for service delivered to the property at which the nonprofit organization primarily operates, if the residential rate is lower than the commercial rate for service at that property. c.     A public utility, in consultation with the Board of Public Utilities, shall establish a reasonable procedure by which an organization may certify itself as a nonprofit organization with the public utility for the purposes of subsection b. of this section. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.